Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 18A State Personnel
18A.095.
Rights of executive branch employees.

A classified employee with status shall not be dismissed, demoted, suspended, or otherwise penalized except for cause.

Prior to dismissal, a classified employee with status shall be notified in writing of the intent to dismiss him. The notice shall also state:

The specific reasons for dismissal including:

The statutory or regulatory violation;

The specific action or activity on which the intent to dismiss is based;

The date, time, and place of such action or activity; and

The name of the parties involved;

That the employee has the right to appear personally, or with counsel if he has retained counsel, to reply to the head of the cabinet or agency or his designee; and

Whether the employee is placed on administrative leave by the appointing authority with pay upon receiving the intent to dismiss letter prior to the agency’s final action.

The Personnel Cabinet shall prescribe and distribute a form to be completed and forwarded by an employee who wishes to appear before the head of the cabinet or agency or his designee, to each appointing authority. The form shall be attached to every notice of intent to dismiss and shall contain written instructions explaining:

The right granted an employee under the provisions of this section relating to pretermination hearings; and

The time limits and procedures to be followed by all parties in pretermination hearings.

No later than five (5) working days after receipt of the notice of intent to dismiss, excluding the day he receives the notice, the employee may request to appear, personally or with counsel if he has retained counsel, to reply to the head of the cabinet or agency or his designee.

Unless waived by the employee, the appearance shall be scheduled within six (6) working days after receipt of an employee’s request to appear before the head of the cabinet or agency or his designee, excluding the day his request is received.

No later than five (5) working days after the employee appears before the head of the cabinet or agency or his designee, excluding the day of the appearance, the cabinet head or agency or his designee shall:

Determine whether to dismiss the employee or to alter, modify, or rescind the intent to dismiss; and

Notify the employee in writing of the decision.

If the cabinet or agency head or his designee determines that the employee shall be dismissed or otherwise penalized, the employee shall be notified in writing of:

The effective date of his dismissal or other penalization;

The specific reason for this action, including:

The statutory or regulatory violation;

The specific action or activity on which the dismissal or other penalization is based;

The date, time, and place of the action or activity; and

The name of the parties involved; and

That he may appeal the dismissal or other penalization to the board within sixty (60) days after receipt of this notification, excluding the day he receives notice.

A classified employee with status who is demoted, suspended, or otherwise penalized shall be notified in writing of:

The demotion, suspension, or other penalization;

The effective date of the demotion, suspension, or other penalization;

The specific reason for the action including:

The statutory or regulatory violation;

The specific action or activity on which the demotion, suspension, or other penalization is based;

The date, time, and place of the action or activity; and

The name of the parties involved; and

That he or she has the right to appeal to the board within sixty (60) days, excluding the day that he or she received notification of the personnel action.

Any unclassified employee who is dismissed, demoted, suspended, or otherwise penalized for cause may, within thirty (30) days after the dismissal, demotion, suspension, or other form of penalization, appeal to the board for review thereof.

An employee whose position is reallocated shall be notified in writing by the appointing authority of:

The reallocation; and

His right to request reconsideration by the secretary within ten (10) working days of receipt of the notice, excluding the day he receives notification.

He shall be provided with a form prescribed by the secretary on which to request reconsideration.

The employee shall file a written request for reconsideration of the reallocation of his position with the secretary in a manner and form prescribed by the secretary and shall be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard thereon by the secretary. The secretary shall make a determination within sixty (60) days after the request has been filed by an employee. After reconsideration of the request by the secretary, the employee may appeal to the board.

Any state employee, applicant for employment, or eligible on a register may appeal to the board on the grounds that his right to inspect or copy records, including preliminary and other supporting documentation, relating to him has been denied, abridged, or impeded by a public agency. The board shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the records related to the employee, applicant, or eligible, and whether his right to inspect or copy these records was denied, abridged, or impeded. If the board determines that the records related to the employee and that the right to inspect or copy these records has been denied, abridged, or impeded, the board shall order the public agency to make them available for inspection and copying and shall charge the cost of the hearing to the public agency. A state employee, an applicant for employment, and an eligible on a register shall not have the right to inspect or to copy any examination materials.

Any classified employee may appeal to the board an action alleged to be based on discrimination due to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age forty (40) and above. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude any classified or unclassified employee from filing with the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights a complaint alleging discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age in accordance with KRS Chapter 344.

When an eligible’s name is removed from a register, the secretary shall notify the eligible of his action and the reasons therefor, together with his right of appeal. An eligible’s name shall be restored to the register upon presentation of reasons satisfactory to the secretary or in accordance with the decision of the board.

Any employee, applicant for employment, or eligible on a register, who believes that he has been discriminated against, may appeal to the board.

Any applicant whose application for admission to an open-competitive examination has been rejected shall be notified of this rejection and the reasons therefor and may appeal to the board for reconsideration of his qualifications and for admission to the examination. Applicants may be conditionally admitted to an examination by the secretary pending reconsideration by the board.

Any applicant who has taken an examination may appeal to the board for a review of his rating in any part of the examination to assure that uniform rating procedures have been applied equally and fairly.

An appeal to the board by applicants or eligibles under subsections (11) and (13) of this section and under this subsection shall be filed in writing with the executive director not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the notification of the action in question was mailed.

An evaluation may be appealed to the board if an employee has complied with the review procedure established in KRS 18A.110(7)(j).

Appeals to the board shall be in writing on an appeal form prescribed by the board. Appeal forms shall be available at the employee’s place of work. The Personnel Cabinet shall be responsible for the distribution of these forms.

The appeal form shall be attached to any notice, or copy of any notice, of dismissal, demotion, suspension, fine, involuntary transfer, or other penalization, reallocation, or notice of any other action an employee may appeal under the provisions of this section. The appeal form shall instruct the employee to state whether he is a classified or unclassified employee, his full name, his appointing authority, work station address and telephone number, and, if he has retained counsel at the time he files an appeal, the name, address, and telephone number of his attorney.

The form shall also instruct a classified employee to state the action he is appealing in a short, plain, concise statement of the facts. The form shall instruct an unclassified employee to make a short, plain, concise statement of the reason for the appeal and the cause given for his dismissal.

Upon receipt of the appeal by the board, the appointing authority and the Personnel Cabinet shall be notified and the board shall schedule a hearing.

All administrative hearings conducted by the board shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The board may deny a hearing to an employee who has failed to file an appeal within the time prescribed by this section; and to an unclassified employee who has failed to state the reasons for the appeal and the cause for which he has been dismissed. The board may deny any appeal after a preliminary hearing if it lacks jurisdiction to grant relief. The board shall notify the employee of its denial in writing and shall inform the employee of his right to appeal the denial under the provisions of KRS

18A.100

.

Any investigation by the board of any matter related to an appeal filed by an employee shall be conducted only upon notice to the employee, the employee’s counsel, and the appointing authority. All parties to the appeal shall have access to information produced by the investigations and the information shall be presented at the hearing.

Each appeal shall be decided individually, unless otherwise agreed by the parties and the board. The board shall not:

Employ class action procedures; or

Conduct test representative cases.

Board members shall abstain from public comment about a pending or impending proceeding before the board. This shall not prohibit board members from making public statements in the course of their official duties or from explaining for public information the procedures of the board.

An appeal to the board may be heard by the full board or one (1) or more of the following: Its executive director, its general counsel, any nonelected member of the board, or any hearing officer secured by the board pursuant to KRS

13B.030

.

If the board finds that the action complained of was taken by the appointing authority in violation of laws prohibiting favor for, or discrimination against, or bias with respect to, his political or religious opinions or affiliations or ethnic origin, or in violation of laws prohibiting discrimination because of such individual’s sex or age or disability, the appointing authority shall immediately reinstate the employee to his former position or a position of like status and pay, without loss of pay for the period of his penalization, or otherwise make the employee whole unless the order is stayed by the board or the court on appeal.

If the board finds that the action complained of was taken without just cause, the board shall order the immediate reinstatement of the employee to his former position or a position of like status and pay, without loss of pay for the period of his penalization, or otherwise make the employee whole unless the order is stayed by the board or the court on appeal.

If the board finds that the action taken by the appointing authority was excessive or erroneous in view of all the surrounding circumstances, the board shall direct the appointing authority to alter, modify, or rescind the disciplinary action.

In all other cases, the board shall direct the appointing authority to rescind the action taken or otherwise grant specific relief or dismiss the appeal.

If a final order of the board is appealed, a court shall award reasonable attorney fees to an employee who prevails by a final adjudication on the merits as provided by KRS

453.260

. This award shall not include attorney fees attributable to the hearing before the board.

When any employee is dismissed and not ordered reinstated after the appeal, the board in its discretion may direct that his name be placed on an appropriate reemployment list for employment in any similar position other than the one from which he had been removed.

After a final decision has been rendered by the board or court, an employee who prevails in his appeal shall be credited with the amount of leave time used for time spent at his hearing before the board or court. Employees who had an insufficient amount of leave time shall be credited with leave time equal to the amount of time spent at their hearings before the board or court.

If the appointing authority appeals the final order of the board, unless the board rules otherwise, the reinstated employee shall remain in his former position, or a position of like status or pay, until the conclusion of the appeals process, at which time the appointing authority shall take action in accordance with the court order.

After a final decision in a contested case has been rendered by the last administrative or judicial body to which the case has been appealed, the board shall make the decision available to the public in electronic format on its Web site and shall organize the decisions according to the statutory basis for which the appeal was based.

For the purposes of subsections (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section, the word “agency” means any agency not assigned to a cabinet for organizational purposes.

Notwithstanding any other prescribed limitation of action, an employee that has been penalized, but has not received a written notice of his or her right to appeal as provided in this section, shall file his or her appeal with the Personnel Board within one (1) year from the date of the penalization or from the date that the employee reasonably should have known of the penalization.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 16, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 250, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 202, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 317, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 475, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 22, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 154, § 23, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 425, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 501, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 104, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 75, § 15, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 153, § 8, effective April 13, 2010.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.270

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 19.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.100.
Appeal of final order of the Personnel Board.

Any final order of the board either upholding or invalidating the dismissal, demotion, suspension, or other penalization of a classified or an unclassified employee may be appealed either by the employee or by the appointing authority.

The party aggrieved may appeal a final order by filing a petition with the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 475, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 23, effective July 15, 1996.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.272

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 20.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.105.
Compensation, retirement system contributions of employee ordered reinstated without loss of pay.

When a classified or unclassified employee has been finally ordered reinstated by the board without loss of pay, pursuant to the provisions of KRS

18A.095

, the executive director of the board shall forward a certified copy of said order to the Personnel Cabinet and the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall process proper payment to the employee for the period of suspension, said payment to be made out of the agency’s appropriations. If no funds or insufficient funds are available in the agency’s appropriations, then payment shall be made out of the “judgments” section of the general fund of the biennial state budget.

Gross moneys which were earned by the employee from other sources during the period of suspension shall be set-off against the gross sum due the employee, to the extent that the moneys were earned in a number of hours comparable to the length of time the employee would have worked in the job from which he was dismissed. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall by regulation provide an administrative procedure for determining reasonable earnings to be so set off.

All other deductions shall be deducted as required by law or by Finance and Administration Cabinet regulation.

Both the employee’s and employer’s contributions to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System shall be based upon the gross amount due the employee, before set off or deduction, except for set-off caused by earnings on which employee and employer contributions to the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System have been paid.

Member and employer contributions paid into the system in which the employee participated after dismissal shall be transferred to the system in which he participated prior to his illegal dismissal. In the event of a difference in member or employer contribution rates between the retirement system under which the member was covered prior to dismissal and the retirement system in which he participated before reinstatement by the board, the member and employer shall pay or receive a refund in order to adjust their respective contribution to the appropriate rate for the system under which he would have participated had he not been dismissed.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 24, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.275

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 21.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.110.
Personnel secretary — Regulatory authority — Resolution of conflicting provisions of law. [Effective until April 1, 2023]

The secretary shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the classified service governing:

Applications and examinations;

Certification and selection of eligibles;

Classification and compensation plans;

Incentive programs;

Lay-offs;

Registers;

Types of appointments;

Attendance; hours of work; compensatory time; annual, court, military, sick, voting, living organ donor, and special leaves of absence, provided that the secretary shall not promulgate administrative regulations that would reduce the rate at which employees may accumulate leave time below the rate effective on December 10, 1985; and

Employee evaluations.

The secretary shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the unclassified service.

Except as provided by KRS

18A.355

, the secretary shall not promulgate administrative regulations that would reduce an employee’s salary; and

As provided by KRS 18A.0751(4)(e), the secretary may submit a proposed administrative regulation providing for an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months to the board for its approval.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations to implement state government’s affirmative action plan under KRS

18A.138

.

The administrative regulations shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, and shall have the force and effect of law after compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 13A and 18A and the procedures adopted thereunder;

Administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary shall not expand or restrict rights granted to, or duties imposed upon, employees and administrative bodies by the provisions of this chapter; and

No administrative body other than the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the subject matters specified in this section.

Prior to filing an administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission, the secretary shall submit the administrative regulation to the board for review.

The board shall review the administrative regulation proposed by the secretary not less than twenty (20) days after its submission to it;

Not less than five (5) days after its review, the board shall submit its recommendations in writing to the secretary;

The secretary shall review the recommendations of the board and may revise the proposed administrative regulation if he deems it necessary; and

After the secretary has completed the review provided for in this section, he may file the proposed administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

The administrative regulations shall provide:

For the preparation, maintenance, and revision of a position classification plan for all positions in the classified service, based upon similarity of duties performed and responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may reasonably be required for, and the same schedule of pay may be equitably applied to, all positions in the same class. The secretary shall allocate the position of every employee in the classified service to one (1) of the classes in the plan. The secretary shall reallocate existing positions, after consultation with appointing authorities, when it is determined that they are incorrectly allocated, and there has been no substantial change in duties from those in effect when such positions were last classified. The occupant of a position being reallocated shall continue to serve in the reallocated position with no reduction in salary;

For a pay plan for all employees in the classified service, after consultation with appointing authorities and the state budget director. The plan shall take into account such factors as:

The relative levels of duties and responsibilities of various classes of positions;

Rates paid for comparable positions elsewhere taking into consideration the effect of seniority on such rates; and

The state’s financial resources.

Amendments to the pay plan shall be made in the same manner. Each employee shall be paid at one (1) of the rates set forth in the pay plan for the class of position in which he is employed, provided that the full amount of the annual increment provided for by the provisions of KRS

18A.355

, and the full amount of an increment due to a promotion, salary adjustment, reclassification, or reallocation, shall be added to an employee’s base salary or wages;

For open competitive examinations to test the relative fitness of applicants for the respective positions. The examinations shall be announced publicly and applications accepted at least ten (10) days prior to certification of a register, and may be advertised through the press, radio, and other media. The secretary shall continue to receive applications and examine candidates on a continuous basis long enough to assure a sufficient number of eligibles to meet the needs of the service. Except as provided by this chapter, he shall add the names of successful candidates to existing eligible lists in accordance with their respective ratings. The secretary shall be free to use any investigation of education and experience and any test of capacity, knowledge, manual skill, character, personal traits, or physical fitness, which in his judgment, serves the need to discover the relative fitness of applicants;

As provided by this chapter, for the establishment of eligible lists for appointment, upon which lists shall be placed the names of successful candidates in the order of their relative excellence in the respective examinations. Except as provided by this chapter, an eligible’s score shall expire automatically one (1) year from the date of testing, unless the life of the score is extended by action of the secretary for a period not to exceed one (1) additional year. Except for those individuals exercising reemployment rights, all eligibles may be removed from the register when a new examination is established;

For the rejection of candidates or eligibles who fail to comply with reasonable requirements of the secretary in regard to such factors as age, physical condition, training, and experience, or who have attempted any deception or fraud in connection with an examination;

Except as provided by this chapter, for the appointment of a person whose score is included in the five (5) highest scores earned on the examination;

For annual, sick, and special leaves of absence, with or without pay, or reduced pay, after approval by the Governor as provided by KRS 18A.155(1)(d);

For lay-offs, in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.113

,

18A.1131

, and

18A.1132

, by reasons of lack of work, abolishment of a position, a material change in duties or organization, or a lack of funds;

For the development and operation of programs to improve the work effectiveness of employees in the state service, including training, whether in-service or compensated educational leave, safety, health, welfare, counseling, recreation, employee relations, and employee mobility without written examination;

For a uniform system of annual employee evaluation for classified employees, with status, that shall be considered in determining eligibility for discretionary salary advancements, promotions, and disciplinary actions. The administrative regulations shall:

Require the secretary to determine the appropriate number of job categories to be evaluated and a method for rating each category;

Provide for periodic informal reviews during the evaluation period which shall be documented on the evaluation form and pertinent comments by either the employee or supervisor may be included;

Establish a procedure for internal dispute resolution with respect to the final evaluation rating;

Permit a classified employee, with status, who receives either of the two (2) lowest possible evaluation ratings to appeal to the Personnel Board for review after exhausting the internal dispute resolution procedure. The final evaluation shall not include supervisor comments on ratings other than the lowest two (2) ratings;

Require that an employee who receives the highest possible rating shall receive the equivalent of two (2) workdays, not to exceed sixteen (16) hours, credited to his or her annual leave balance. An employee who receives the second highest possible rating shall receive the equivalent of one (1) workday, not to exceed eight (8) hours, credited to his or her annual leave balance; and

Require that an employee who receives the lowest possible evaluation rating shall either be demoted to a position commensurate with the employee’s skills and abilities or be terminated; and

For other administrative regulations not inconsistent with this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, as may be proper and necessary for its enforcement.

For any individual hired or elected to office before January 1, 2015, and paid through the Kentucky Human Resources Information System, the Personnel Cabinet shall not require payroll payments to be made by direct deposit or require the individual to use a Web-based program to access his or her salary statement.

To the extent that KRS

16.010

to

16.199

and administrative regulations promulgated by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police under authority granted in KRS Chapter 16 conflict with this section or any administrative regulation promulgated by the secretary pursuant to authority granted in this section, the provisions of KRS Chapter 16 shall prevail.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 17, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 203, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 414, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 309, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 486, § 35, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 25, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 487, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 540, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 501, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2015 ch. 25, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 110, § 11, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 109, § 10, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 107, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). This statute was amended in
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 10 and
ch. 110, sec. 11.
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 15 provided that ch. 110 takes precedence over ch. 109. Chapter 110 was also the later-passed bill. Therefore,
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 110, sec. 11 has been codified and
2016 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 10 has not.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by
1998 Ky. Acts chs. 154,
487, and
540. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists between Acts chs. 154 and 540, Acts ch. 540, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under
KRS

446.250

.